Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.06.030

Abandonment of plan of government of a noncharter code city.

By use of the resolution for election or petition for election methods described in RCW 35A.06.040, any noncharter code city which has operated for more than six consecutive years under one of the optional plans of government authorized by this title, or for more than a combined total of six consecutive years under a particular plan of government both as a code city and under the same general plan under Title 35 RCW immediately prior to becoming a code city, may abandon such organization and may reorganize and adopt another plan of government authorized for noncharter code cities, but only after having been a noncharter code city for more than one year or a city after operating for more than six consecutive years under a particular plan of government as a noncharter code city: PROVIDED, That these limitations shall not apply to a city seeking to adopt a charter.

In reorganization under a different general plan of government as a noncharter code city, officers shall serve the remainder of their terms. If a city with a mayor-council plan of government is reorganized with a council-manager plan of government, the mayor shall serve as a councilmember for the remainder of his or her term. If a city with a council-manager plan of government is reorganized with a mayor-council plan of government, the mayor shall be elected as provided in RCW 35A.02.050. When a noncharter code city adopts a plan of government other than those authorized under Title 35A RCW, such city ceases to be governed under this optional municipal code, shall be classified as a city or town of the class selected in the proceeding for adoption of such new plan, with the powers granted to such class under the general law, and shall elect officers as provided in RCW 35A.02.050.

[ 2001 c 33 s 2; 1994 c 223 s 28; 1994 c 81 s 69; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 13; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.06.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.